Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 4

Tennessee Condominium Act of 2008 — Unit Owners' Association

66-27-401. Organization of unit owners' association.

A unit owners' association must be organized no later than the date the first unit in the condominium is conveyed. The membership of the association at all times shall consist exclusively of all the unit owners or, following termination of the condominium, of all former unit owners entitled to distributions of proceeds under §66-27-318, or their heirs, successors, or assigns. The association shall be organized as a profit or nonprofit corporation or limited liability company or, in the case of a condominium with four (4) or fewer units that is not a master association, the association may be organized as an unincorporated association.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-402. Powers of unit owners' association.

Except as provided in subsection (b), and subject to the declaration, the association, even if unincorporated, or if incorporated or a limited liability company even if subsequently dissolved administratively, may:

Adopt and amend bylaws, and rules and regulations;

Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves and collect assessments for common expenses from unit owners;

Hire and discharge managing agents and other employees, agents, and independent contractors;

Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two (2) or more unit owners on matters affecting the condominium;

Make contracts and incur liabilities;

Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of common elements;

Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common elements;

Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title, or interest to real or personal property, but common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest only pursuant to § 66-27-412;

Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or over the common elements;

Impose and receive any payments, fees, or charges for the use, rental, or operation of the common elements, other than limited common elements described in § 66-27-302(2) and (4), and for services provided to unit owners;

Impose charges for late payment of assessments and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, levy reasonable fines for violations of the declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the association;

Impose reasonable charges for the preparation and recordation of amendments to the declaration or the provision of information required by § 66-27-502;

Impose reasonable charges for services rendered in connection with the transfer of a unit;

Provide for the indemnification of its officers and members of its board of directors and maintain directors' and officers' liability insurance;

Assign its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense assessments, but, except for assignments of income to finance common expenses of the association, only to the extent the declaration expressly so provides;

Exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration or bylaws;

Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this state by legal entities of the same type as the association; and

Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the governance and operation of the association.

The declaration may not impose limitations on the power of the association to deal with the declarant, its agents or contractors, that are more restrictive than the limitations imposed on the power of the association to deal with other persons.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-403. Board of directors and officers.

Except as provided in the declaration, the bylaws, in subsection (b), or other provisions of part 2, part 3, this part and part 5 of this chapter, the board of directors may act in all instances on behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, the officers and members of the board of directors are required to exercise:

If appointed by the declarant, the care required of fiduciaries of the unit owners; or

If elected by the unit owners, ordinary and reasonable care.

The board of directors may not act on behalf of the association to amend the declaration pursuant to § 66-27-317, to terminate the condominium pursuant to § 66-27-318, or to elect members of the board of directors or determine the qualifications, powers and duties, or terms of office of members of the board of directors pursuant to subsection (f), but the board of directors may fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of any term, and may elect members of the board of directors of a master association as provided in the declaration.

Subject to subsection (d), the declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during which period a declarant, or persons designated by the declarant, may appoint and remove the officers and members of the board of directors. Regardless of the period provided in the declaration, a period of declarant control terminates no later than the earlier of:

One hundred twenty (120) days after conveyance of seventy-five percent (75%) of the units that may be created to unit owners other than a declarant; or

Five (5) years after the conveyance of the first unit to a purchaser other than the declarant or, if more than one hundred (100) units may be created in the condominium, then seven (7) years after the first conveyance.

A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the board of directors before termination of that period, but in that event the declarant may require, for the duration of the period of declarant control, that specified actions of the association or board of directors, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.

Not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after conveyance of twenty-five percent (25%) of the units that may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, at least one (1) member of the board must be elected by unit owners other than the declarant.

Not later than the termination of any period of declarant control, the unit owners shall elect a board of directors of at least three (3) members, at least a majority of whom must be unit owners. The board of directors shall elect the officers. The board of directors and officers shall take office upon election.

Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration or bylaws to the contrary, the unit owners, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of all persons present and entitled to vote at any meeting of the unit owners at which a quorum is present, may remove any member of the board of directors with or without cause, other than a member appointed by the declarant.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-404. Transfer of special declarant rights.

No special declarant right, created or reserved under part 2, part 3, this part and part 5 of this chapter may be transferred except by an instrument evidencing the transfer recorded in the register's office in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located. The instrument is not effective unless executed by the transferee.

Upon transfer of any special declarant right, the liability of a transferor declarant is as follows:

A transferor is not relieved of any obligation or liability arising before the transfer. Lack of privity does not deprive the association or any unit owner of standing to maintain an action to enforce any obligation of the transferor.

If a successor to any special declarant right is an affiliate of a declarant as defined by § 66-27-203, the transferor is jointly and severally liable with the successor for any obligations or liabilities of the successor relating to the condominium.

If a transferor retains any special declarant right, but transfers other special declarant rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the declarant, the transferor is liable for any obligations or liabilities imposed on a declarant by part 2, part 3, this part and part 5 of this chapter or by the declaration relating to the retained special declarant rights and arising after the transfer.

A transferor has no liability for any act or omission or any breach of a contractual obligation arising from the exercise of a special declarant right by a successor declarant who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Unless otherwise provided in a mortgage instrument or deed of trust, in case of foreclosure of a mortgage, tax sale, judicial sale, sale by a trustee under a deed of trust, or sale under the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. § 101 et seq.), receivership proceedings, or sale by the association pursuant to its declaration, of any units owned by a declarant or other real estate in a condominium subject to development rights, a person acquiring title to all the real estate being foreclosed or sold succeeds to all special declarant rights related to that real estate held by that declarant, unless the person acquiring title records an instrument within one hundred twenty (120) days following the foreclosure, in the register's office of every county in which any portion of the condominium lies, disclaiming any or all of such rights.

Upon foreclosure, tax sale, judicial sale, sale by a trustee under a deed of trust, or sale under the United States Bankruptcy Code, receivership proceedings, or sale by the association pursuant to its declaration, of all units and other real estate in a condominium owned by a declarant:

The declarant ceases to have any special declarant rights; and

All special declarant rights continue in favor of the purchaser unless disclaimed by a recorded instrument within one hundred twenty (120) days following the foreclosure or sale as provided in subsection (c).

The liabilities and obligations of a person who succeeds to special declarant rights are as follows:

A successor to any special declarant right who is an affiliate of a declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed on the transferor by part 2, part 3, this part and part 5 of this chapter or by the declaration;

A successor to any special declarant right, other than a successor described in subdivision (e)(3) or (e)(4), who is not an affiliate of a declarant, is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed by part 2, part 3, this part and part 5 of this chapter or the declaration:

On a declarant who relates to the declarant's exercise or non-exercise of special declarant rights; or

On the declarant's transferor, other than:

Misrepresentations by any previous declarant;

Warranty obligations on improvements made by any previous declarant, or made before the condominium was created;

Breach of any fiduciary obligation by any previous declarant or the previous declarant's appointees to the board of directors; or

Any liability or obligation imposed on the transferor as a result of the transferor's acts or omissions after the transfer;

A successor to only a right reserved in the declaration to maintain models, sales offices, and signs pursuant to § 66-27-315, if the successor is not an affiliate of a declarant, may not exercise any other special declarant right, and is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant, except the obligation to provide the information required by part 5 of this chapter, and any liability arising as a result of the obligation; and

A successor to all special declarant rights held by the successor's transferor who is not an affiliate of that declarant and who succeeded to those rights pursuant to a deed in lieu of foreclosure or a judgment or instrument conveying title to units under subsection (c), may declare the successor’s intention within one hundred twenty (120) days after acquiring title, in an instrument recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium lies, to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person. Thereafter, until transferring all special declarant rights to any person acquiring title to any unit owned by the successor, or unit recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, that successor may not exercise any of those rights other than any right held by the successor’s transferor to control the board of directors in accordance with § 66-27-403(d) for the duration of any period of declarant control, and any attempted exercise of those rights is void. So long as a successor declarant has not or may not exercise special declarant rights under this subsection (e), the successor declarant is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant other than liability for the successor declarant’s acts and omissions under § 66-27-403(d).

Nothing in this section subjects any successor to a special declarant right to any claims against or other obligations of a transferor declarant, other than claims and obligations arising under part 2, part 3, this part and part 5 of this chapter or the declaration.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-405. Termination of contracts and leases of declarant.

If entered into before the board of directors elected by the unit owners pursuant to §66-27-403(e) takes office, any contract or lease between the association and a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant, unless the contract or lease exercises a development right or a special declarant right, or any other contract or lease that was not disclosed in the declaration or otherwise in writing prior to the first conveyance of a unit to a party other than the declarant, and at the time entered into was unconscionable to the unit owners under the circumstances then prevailing, may be terminated without penalty by the association at any time after the board of directors elected by the unit owners pursuant to §66-27-403(e) takes office, upon not less than ninety (90) days notice to the other party. This section does not apply to any lease, the termination of which would terminate the condominium or reduce its size, unless the real estate subject to that lease was included in the condominium for the purpose of avoiding the right of the association to terminate a lease under this section. This section applies only to condominiums containing units restricted to residential purposes.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-406. Bylaws.

The bylaws of the association must provide for:

The number of members of the board of directors and the titles of the officers of the association;

Election by the board of directors of a president, secretary, and any other officers of the association the bylaws specify;

The qualifications, powers and duties, terms of office, and manner of electing and removing members of the board of directors and officers and filling vacancies;

Which, if any, of its powers the board of directors or officers may delegate to other persons or to a managing agent;

Which of its officers may prepare, execute, certify, and record amendments to the declaration on behalf of the association; and

The method of amending the bylaws.

Subject to the declaration, the bylaws may provide for any other matters the association deems necessary and appropriate.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-407. Upkeep of condominium.

Except to the extent provided by the declaration, subsection (b), or § 66-27-413(h), the association is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common elements, and each unit owner is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of the unit owner's unit. Each unit owner shall afford to the association and the other unit owners, and to their agents or employees, access to and through the unit owner’s unit that is reasonably necessary for those purposes. If damage is inflicted on the common elements, or on any unit through which access is taken, the unit owner responsible for the damage, or the association if it is responsible, is liable for the cost of the prompt repair thereof, to the extent the cost of repair is not covered by property insurance required to be maintained by the declaration.

In addition to the liability that a declarant as a unit owner has under part 2, part 3, this part and part 5 of this chapter, the declarant alone is liable for all expenses in connection with real estate subject to development rights, to the extent the expenses exceed the benefit derived by the association or the other unit owners from the benefit. No other unit owner and no other portion of the condominium is subject to a claim for payment of those expenses. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any income or proceeds from real estate subject to development rights inures to the declarant.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

Cross-References. Insurance, §66-27-413.

66-27-408. Meetings.

A meeting of the association must be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the association may be called by the president, a majority of the board of directors or by unit owners having twenty percent (20%), or any lower percentage specified in the bylaws, of the votes in the association. Not less than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days in advance of any meeting, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand-delivered, sent prepaid by United States mail, by facsimile, electronically, or by other means expressly authorized by the declaration, to the address of each unit or to any other physical or electronic address designated in writing or by electronic means by the unit owner. The notice of any meeting must state the time, place, and method of attendance of or at the meeting and the items on the agenda, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, any budget changes, and any proposal to remove a director or officer. Notice may be waived in writing signed by all unit owners.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-409. Quorums.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is present throughout any meeting of the association if persons entitled to cast twenty percent (20%) of the votes that may be cast for election of the board of directors are present in person or by proxy at the beginning of the meeting.

Unless the bylaws specify a larger percentage, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the board of directors if persons entitled to cast fifty percent (50%) of the votes on that board are present at the beginning of the meeting.

Attendance at a meeting may be in person, by telephone, or by any other means specified in the bylaws. Attendance at a meeting of the association may also be by proxy.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-410. Voting — Proxies.

If only one (1) of the multiple owners of a unit is present at a meeting of the association, that owner is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that unit. If more than one (1) of the multiple owners are present, the votes allocated to that unit may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the multiple owners, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is majority agreement if any one (1) of the multiple owners casts the votes allocated to that unit without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other owners of the unit.

Votes allocated to a unit may be cast pursuant to proxy duly executed by a unit owner. If a unit is owned by more than one (1) person, each owner of the unit may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other owners of the unit through a duly executed proxy. A unit owner may not revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section, except by actual notice of revocation to the person presiding over a meeting of the association. A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice. The duration of a proxy is governed by the Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 51-68, including, without limitation, § 48-57-205.

If the declaration requires that votes on specified matters affecting the condominium be cast by lessees rather than unit owners of leased units:

Subsections (a) and (b) apply to lessees as if they were unit owners;

Unit owners who have leased their units to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and

Lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were unit owners. Unit owners must also be given notice, in the manner provided in § 66-27-408, of all meetings at which lessees may be entitled to vote.

No votes allocated to a unit owned by the association may be cast.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-411. Tort and contract liability.

Any action alleging a wrong done by the association must be brought against the association and not against any unit owner. A unit owner is not precluded from bringing an action contemplated by this section because the unit owner is a unit owner or a member or officer of the association.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-412. Conveyance or encumbrance of common elements.

Portions of the common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest by the association if persons entitled to cast at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the association, including, during any period of declarant control, eighty percent (80%) of the votes allocated to units not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, agree to that action; and a like percentage vote by the owners of any units to which any limited common element is allocated must agree in order to convey that limited common element or subject it to a security interest. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. Proceeds of the sale are an asset of the association; provided, that proceeds of a sale of a limited common element shall be reserved for the benefit of the unit or units to which the limited common element is allocated.

An agreement to convey common elements or subject them to a security interest must be evidenced by the execution of an agreement, or ratifications of the agreement, in the same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of unit owners. The agreement may specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless recorded before that date. The agreement and all ratifications of the agreement must be recorded in every county in which a portion of the condominium is situated, and is effective only upon recordation.

The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract to convey common elements, or subject them to a security interest, but the contract is not enforceable against the association until approved pursuant to subsections (a) and (b). Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the conveyance or encumbrance, including the power to execute deeds or other instruments.

Any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale or other voluntary transfer of common elements, unless made pursuant to this section, is voidable; provided, that no action challenging the validity of a conveyance or encumbrance made by the association pursuant to this section may be brought more than one (1) year following the conveyance or encumbrance.

A conveyance or encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section does not deprive any unit of its rights of access to and support of the unit and the remaining common elements and essential services.

A conveyance or encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section does not affect the priority or validity of preexisting encumbrances.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-413. Insurance.

Commencing no later than the time of the first conveyance of a unit to a person other than a declarant, the association shall maintain, to the extent reasonably available:

Property insurance on the common elements insuring against risks of direct physical loss commonly insured against for similar properties. The total amount of insurance after application of any deductibles shall be no less than eighty percent (80%) of the total replacement cost of the insured property at the time the insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, foundations and other items normally excluded from property policies; and

Liability insurance, including medical payments insurance, in an amount determined by the board of directors, but no less than any amount specified in the declaration, covering all occurrences commonly insured against for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of or in connection with the use, ownership, or maintenance of the common elements.

In the case of a building containing units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, the insurance maintained under subdivision (a)(1), to the extent reasonably available, shall include the units, but need not include improvements and betterments installed by unit owners.

If the insurance described in subsections (a) and (b) is not reasonably available, the association shall promptly cause notice of that fact to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to all unit owners. The declaration may require the association to carry any other insurance, and the association, in any event, may carry any other insurance it deems appropriate to protect the association or the unit owners.

Insurance policies carried pursuant to subsection (a) must provide that:

Each unit owner is an insured person under the policy with respect to liability arising out of the unit owner's interest in the common elements or membership in the association;

The insurer waives its right to subrogation under the policy against any unit owner, lessee, or member of the owner's or lessee's household, unless it can be shown that the act with intent to cause the loss of the unit owner, lessee, or member of the owner's or lessee's household was the cause of the loss;

No act or omission by any unit owner, unless acting in the capacity of a governing board member of the association, will void the policy or be a condition to recovery under the policy; and

If, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a unit owner covering the same risk covered by the policy, the association's policy provides primary insurance.

Any loss covered by the property policy under subdivision (a)(1) and subsection (b) must be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for that loss are payable to any insurance trustee designated for that purpose, or otherwise to the association, and not to any mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold any insurance proceeds in trust for unit owners and lienholders as their interests may appear. Subject to subsection (h), the proceeds must be disbursed first for the repair or restoration of the damaged property, and unit owners and lienholders are not entitled to receive payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is a surplus of proceeds after the property has been completely repaired or restored, or the condominium is terminated.

An insurance policy issued to the association does not prevent a unit owner from obtaining insurance for the unit owner's own benefit.

An insurer that has issued an insurance policy under this section shall issue certificates or memoranda of insurance to the association and, upon written request, to any unit owner, mortgagee, or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurer issuing the policy may not cancel or refuse to renew it until after notice of the proposed cancellation or nonrenewal has been mailed to the association and to each and any additional insured under the policy at their respective last known addresses, in accordance with the Cancellation of Commercial Risk Insurance Act, compiled in title 56, chapter 7, part 18, or, if the policy is a policy of personal risk insurance, as defined in § 56-5-102, then in accordance with the law governing such insurance.

Any portion of the condominium for which insurance is required under this section that is damaged or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless:

The condominium is terminated;

Repair or replacement would be illegal under any state or local health or safety statute or ordinance; or

Eighty percent (80%) of the unit owners, together with eighty percent (80%) of owners of units that are assigned limited common elements that will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild.

The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds and reserves is a common expense. If the entire condominium is not repaired or replaced:

The insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged common elements must be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the condominium;

The insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited common elements that are not rebuilt must be distributed to the owners of those units and the owners of the units to which those limited common elements were allocated, or to lienholders, as their interests may appear; and

The remainder of the proceeds must be distributed to all the unit owners or lienholders, as their interests may appear, in proportion to the common element interests of all the units.

If the unit owners vote not to rebuild any unit, that unit's allocated interests are automatically reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been condemned under § 66-27-207(a), and the association promptly shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations. Notwithstanding this subsection (h), § 66-27-318 governs the distribution of insurance proceeds if the condominium is terminated. This section may be varied or waived in the case of a condominium all of whose units are restricted to nonresidential use.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 56-5-302 referenced in subdivision (g) of this section was renumbered as 56-5-102 by the authority of the code commission in 2016.

66-27-414. Assessments for common expenses.

Until the board of directors makes a common expense assessment, the declarant shall pay all common expenses. After any assessment has been made by the board of directors, assessments must be made at least annually, based on a budget adopted at least annually by the board of directors.

Except for assessments under subsections (c)-(e), all common expenses must be assessed against all the units in accordance with the allocations set forth in the declaration pursuant to § 66-27-307(a). Any past due common expense assessment or installment of the common expense assessment bears interest at the rate established by the association not exceeding the maximum effective annual rate of interest as determined by the department of financial institutions.

To the extent permitted by the declaration:

Any common expense associated with the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a limited common element may be assessed against the units to which that limited common element is assigned, equally, or in any other proportion that the declaration provides;

Any common expense or portion of the common expense benefiting fewer than all of the units may be assessed exclusively against the units benefited; and

The costs of insurance may be assessed in proportion to risk and the costs of utilities must be assessed in proportion to usage.

Assessments to pay a judgment against the association pursuant to § 66-27-416(a) may be made only against the units in the condominium at the time the judgment was entered, in proportion to their common expense liabilities.

If any common expense is caused by the misconduct of any unit owner, the association may assess that expense exclusively against the owner's unit.

If common expense liabilities are reallocated, common expense assessments and any installment of the common expense assessments not yet due shall be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated common expense liabilities.

With respect to residential units only, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary set forth in the declaration, the board of directors shall have the power at any time to levy assessments to preserve the physical integrity of the condominium or to comply with governmental requirements applicable to the condominium. The assessments may be in the form of a single assessment or an assessment for reserves to be paid in such installments as shall be determined by the board of directors.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

Cross-References. Insurance, §66-27-413.